Utah statutes.
54-14-104.   Rules and procedures.

The board may, pursuant to Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, adopt rules governing proceedings under this chapter consistent with this chapter and Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act.



Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

